test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-koush_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kouš: # Noun 106 'eng /est kauss/fin' - full paradigm
     kouš+N+Sg+Nom: kouš
     kouš+N+Sg+Gen: kouš
     kouš+N+Sg+Par: koušõ
     kouš+N+Sg+Dat: koušõn
     kouš+N+Sg+Ins: koušõks
     kouš+N+Sg+Ill: koušõ
     kouš+N+Sg+Ela: koušõst
     kouš+N+Pl+Nom: kōšõd
     kouš+N+Pl+Gen: kōšõd
     kouš+N+Pl+Par: kōšidi
     kouš+N+Pl+Dat: kōšõdõn
     kouš+N+Pl+Ins: kōšõdõks
     kouš+N+Pl+Ill: kōšiz
     kouš+N+Pl+Ela: kōšist
